Louisiana, session 2026, HB430.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1665.5 and 1665.6 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1665.5. The City of Lafayette; health insurance coverage for surviving spouses and
children of firemen in certain cases
A. The employer of a fireman employed by the City of Lafayette who suffers
death as a result of any injury arising out of and in the course of the performance of
his official duties as a fireman, or arising out of any activity while on or off duty in
his capacity as a fireman in the protection of life or property, shall provide and pay
for health insurance coverage for the fireman's surviving spouse until the surviving
spouse reaches Medicare eligibility.
B.(1) The employer of a fireman employed by the City of Lafayette who
suffers death as a result of any injury arising out of and in the course of the
performance of his official duties as a fireman, or arising out of any activity while
on or off duty in his capacity as a fireman in the protection of life or property, shall
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 430 ENROLLED
provide and pay for health insurance coverage for the fireman's child, stepchild, or
adopted child who is any of the following:
(a) Under the age of twenty-six.
(b) Physically or mentally disabled.
(2) The employer shall provide and pay for the health insurance required by
this Subsection following the death of the fireman until the child no longer meets the
qualifications provided pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
C. If health insurance coverage is offered by the employer to active
members, the health insurance provided to a surviving spouse or child pursuant to
this Section shall be equal in coverage to that offered to active members.
D.(1) The surviving spouse may decline the health insurance coverage
required by Subsection A of this Section.
(2) The surviving parent or legal guardian of each child, stepchild, or
adopted child of the deceased fireman may decline the health insurance coverage
required by Subsection B of this Section for the child.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of
this Section shall be applied retroactively to January 1, 2017, for the payment of
health insurance benefits for the surviving spouse and the children, stepchildren, and
adopted children of any firemen who suffered death as a result of any injury arising
out of and in the course of the performance of his official duties as a fireman, or
arising out of any activity while on or off duty in his capacity as a fireman in the
protection of life or property.
§1665.6. The City of Lafayette; health insurance coverage for surviving spouses and
children of law enforcement officers in certain cases
A. The employer of a law enforcement officer employed by the City of
Lafayette who suffers death as a result of any injury arising out of and in the course
of the performance of his official duties as a law enforcement officer, or arising out
of any activity while on or off duty in his capacity as a law enforcement officer in
the protection of life or property, shall provide and pay for health insurance coverage
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 430 ENROLLED
for the law enforcement officer's surviving spouse until the surviving spouse reaches
Medicare eligibility.
B.(1) The employer of a law enforcement officer employed by the City of
Lafayette who suffers death as a result of any injury arising out of and in the course
of the performance of his official duties as a law enforcement officer, or arising out
of any activity while on or off duty in his capacity as a law enforcement officer in
the protection of life or property, shall provide and pay for health insurance coverage
for the law enforcement officer's child, stepchild, or adopted child who is any of the
following:
(a) Under the age of twenty-six.
(b) Physically or mentally disabled.
(2) The employer shall provide and pay for the health insurance required by
this Subsection following the death of the law enforcement officer until the child no
longer meets the qualifications pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
C. If health insurance coverage is offered by the employer to active
members, the health insurance provided to a surviving spouse or child pursuant to
this Section shall be equal in coverage to that offered to active members.
D.(1) The surviving spouse may decline the health insurance coverage
required by Subsection A of this Section.
(2) The surviving parent or legal guardian of each child, stepchild, or
adopted child of the deceased law enforcement officer may decline the health
insurance coverage required by Subsection B of this Section for the child.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of
this Section shall be applied retroactively to January 1, 2017, for the payment of
health insurance benefits for the surviving spouse and the children, stepchildren, and
adopted children of any law enforcement officer who suffered death as a result of
any injury arising out of and in the course of the performance of his official duties
as a law enforcement officer, or arising out of any activity while on or off duty in his
capacity as a law enforcement officer in the protection of life or property.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 430 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 40:1665.5 and 1665.6 as enacted by Section 1 of this Act shall be
known and may be cited as the "MJ 911 Act" in memory of officers lost in the line of duty.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.